Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3137.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14 of chapter 19D of the General Laws, as appearing in 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following sentence:- “A
required notice period to terminate a written residency agreement shall not be enforceable upon
the death of a resident. Upon the death of a resident, a sponsor shall provide not less than 10
days for the removal of personal belongings without charges, expenses, or other assessments
otherwise due under a written residency agreement.”.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 1